Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.140

Who may adopt or be adopted.

(1) Any person may be adopted, regardless of his or her age or residence.

(2) Any person who is legally competent and who is eighteen years of age or older may be an adoptive parent.

[ 1984 c 155 s 14.]